Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1029.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.643, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Animal premises data. (a) Except for farmed Cervidae premises location data collected and maintained under section 35.155, the following data collected and maintained by the Board of Animal Health related to registration and identification of premises and animals under chapter 35, are classified as private or nonpublic: (1) the names and addresses; (2) the location of the premises where animals are kept; and (3) the identification number of the premises or the animal. deleted text begin (b) Except as provided in section 347.58, subdivision 5, data collected and maintained by the Board of Animal Health under sections 347.57 to 347.64 are classified as private or nonpublic. deleted text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end The Board of Animal Health may disclose data collected under paragraph (a) deleted text begin or (b)deleted text end to any person, agency, or to the public if the board determines that the access will aid in the law enforcement process or the protection of public or animal health or safety. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 347.36, is amended to read: 347.36 ADVERTISING. All advertising new text begin pertaining to the sale of animals new text end by any person, firm, or corporation licensed hereunder shall include the number of the current license issued to such licenseenew text begin or a link to a website that includes the number of the current licensenew text end . Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 347.58, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Inspections. (a) The board must inspect each licensed facility at least annually. The inspection must be with the commercial breeder or an agent of the commercial breeder present. The inspector must submit an inspection report to the board within ten days of each inspection on a form prepared by the board. The inspection report form must list separately each law, rule, regulation, and ordinance the facility is not in compliance with and what correction is required for compliance. The inspection report form must document the animal inventory on the date of the inspectionnew text begin and must contain all business names used by the commercial breeder in connection with the sale of dogs or cats, the facility identification number, the name of the facility, and the city or township in which the facility is locatednew text end . (b) If, after the prelicense inspection, the commercial breeder has two consecutive years of inspections with no violations, the board must inspect the commercial breeder at least every two years. If the commercial breeder has any violations during an inspection or if the board has cause, the board must inspect the commercial breeder at least annually. (c) If a license to operate is suspended, revoked, or denied, the board must be granted access to the facility during normal business hours to verify that it is not operating.